Wyoming, session 2025, HB0171.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-4-303(a)(iii) is amended to read:

6-4-303. Sexual exploitation of children; penalties;
definitions.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0171

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0578
(iii) "Explicit sexual conduct" means actual or
simulated sexual intercourse, including genital-genital,
oral-genital, anal-genital or oral-anal, between persons of
the same or opposite sex, bestiality, masturbation,
sadistic or masochistic abuse or lascivious exhibition of
the genitals or pubic area of any person or the chest or
breasts of a female person;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0171